District of Columbia statutes.
3-1204.09

Fees.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Mayor is authorized to establish a fee schedule for all services related to the regulation of all health occupations under this chapter, in accordance with the requirements of District law.

(b)

(1)

The fee for the issuance of a medical license shall be set by the Board of Medicine; provided, that the fee shall be no less than $500 and shall be sufficient to fund the programmatic needs of the Board.

(2)

The fee for the issuance of a license to practice pharmaceutical detailing shall be set by the Board of Pharmacy.

(3)

The fee for the issuance of a license to practice by a physician-in-training, if any, shall be determined by the Board of Medicine.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 409, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-263, § 201(b), 54 DCR 807
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 102(d), 55 DCR 1659
Mar. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-104, § 2(c), 59 DCR 435
1981 Ed., § 2-3304.9.
D.C. Law 16-263 inserted “; provided, that the fee for the issuance of a medical license shall be set by the Board of Medicine; provided further, that the fee shall be no less than $500 and shall be sufficient to fund the programmatic needs of the Board”.
D.C. Law 17-131 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “The Mayor is authorized to establish a fee schedule for all services related to the regulation of all health occupations under this chapter, in accordance with the requirements of District law; provided, that the fee for the issuance of a medical license shall be set by the Board of Medicine; provided further, that the fee shall be no less than $500 and shall be sufficient to fund the programmatic needs of the Board.”
D.C. Law 19-104 added subsec. (b)(3).